src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Hiligaynon morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ng o p q r s t u v w x y z
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ng O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z

 %-
 %>:0
 %<:0
 %^N:ng
 %^K:0
 %^C1:0
 %^C2:0
 %^C3:0
 %^C4:0
 %^C5:0
 %^C6:0
 %^V1:0
 %^V2:0 ;

Sets

Vow =  a e i o u
       A E I O U ;
Cns =  b c d f g h j k l m n ng p q r s t v w x z
       B C D F G H J K L M N Ng P Q R S T V W X Z
       ;
CnsPlus = Cns %> ; !!TODO Check to see if this is relevant to C5 reduplication, if not, delete it

Rules

">:h Adding h to suffix after vowel final stems"
%>:h <=> Vow _ ;

"^N:n Nasal assimilation"
%^N:n <=> _ ( %<: ) [ t | d | s ] ;

"^N:m Nasal assimilation"
%^N:m <=> _ ( %<: ) [ p | b ] ;

!TODO work on trisyllabic roots (C6 rule?)
!Max Syllable structure: (C1) (C2) V1 (C3) . (C4) (C5) V2 (C6)

!!"C1 reduplication"
!!%^C1:Cx <=> _    %^C2:  %^V1: %^C3: %^C4: %^C5: %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- :Cx ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;
!!
!!"C2 reduplication"
!!%^C2:Cx <=> %^C1: _     %^V1: %^C3: %^C4: %^C5: %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- :Cns :Cx ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;
!!
!!"V1 reduplication"
!!%^V1:Vx <=> %^C1: %^C2:  _    %^C3: %^C4: %^C5: %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vx ;
!!      where Vx in Vow ;
!!
!!"C3 reduplication"
!!%^C3:Cx <=>             %^V1:  _    %^C4: %^C5: %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vow: :Cx ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;
!!
!!"C4 reduplication"
!!%^C4:Cx <=>             %^V1: %^C3: _     %^C5: %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vow: :Cns :Cx ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;
!!
!!"C5 reduplication"
!!%^C5:Cx <=>                         %^C4:  _    %^V2: %^C6: %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vow: :Cns^2  CnsPlus:Cx Vow: ( :Cns ) ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;
!!
!!"V2 reduplication"
!!%^V2:Vx <=>             %^V1: %^C3: %^C4: %^C5:  _    %^C6: %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vow: ( :Cns^1,3 )       Vx   ( :Cns ) ;
!!      where Vx in Vow ;
!!
!!"C6 reduplication"
!!%^C6:Cx <=>                                     %^V2: _     %<:%- ( :Cns^1,2 ) Vow: ( :Cns^1,3 )       Vow:  :Cx [ ?* - [ Vow: :Cns ?* ] ] .#. ;
!!      where Cx in Cns ;

!!"Stem boundary to hyphen"
!!%<:%- <=> %^V1:Vow ?* _ ;
